Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 30.902 is amended to read:
30.902. (1) A physician licensed  pursuant to ORS chapter 677 is not a manufacturer, distributor,
seller or lessor of a product for the purposes of ORS 30.900 to 30.920 if :
(a) [ The product is  provided by the physician ] The physician provides the product to a patient
as part of [ a medical procedure ] health care services;  and
(b) The physician was not involved in the design or manufacture of the product.
(2)(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a health care facility as
defined in ORS 442.015 or a hospital-affiliated clinic as defined in ORS 442.612 is not a man-
ufacturer, distributor, seller or lessor of a product for the purposes of ORS 30.900 to 30.920
if:
(A) The health care facility or hospital-affiliated clinic provides the  product to a patient
as part of health care services; and
(B) The health care facility or hospital-affiliated clinic  was not involved in the design or
manufacture of the product.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a product that a health care facility or  hospital-
affiliated clinic offers to the general public in a retail setting.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, a professional corporation
or entity organized for the purpose of practicing medicine pursuant to ORS chapter 677  or
rendering professional health care services pursuant to ORS 677.505 to 677.525  or 678.375 to
678.390 is not a manufacturer, distributor, seller or lessor of a product  for the purposes of
ORS 30.900 to 30.920 if:
(A) The professional corporation or entity provides  the product to a patient as part of
health care services; and
(B) The professional corporation or entity was not involved in the design or manufacture
of the product.
(b) This subsection does not  apply to a product that a professional corporation or entity
offers to the general public in a retail setting.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, a residential care facility
licensed under ORS chapter 443, including a facility with a memory care endorsement  under
ORS 443.886 and an assisted living facility, is not a  manufacturer, distributor, seller or lessor
of a product for the purposes of ORS 30.900 to 30.920 if:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1173 (SB 1173-A) Page 1
(A) The residential care facility provides the product to a patient as part  of health care
services; and
(B) The residential care facility was not involved in  the design or manufacture of the
product.
(b) This subsection does not apply to  a product that a residential care facility offers to
the general public in a retail setting.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 30.902 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply  to actions
commenced on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1173 (SB 1173-A) Page 2